Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska50-447
Policy instruments advancing state interest in structure, development, and progress of agricultural production; study by Agriculture Committee; use of experts.

(1) It is the intent of the Legislature to support and facilitate a study by the Agriculture Committee of the Legislature to identify policy instruments available to the Legislature and the people of Nebraska, including, as appropriate, but not necessarily requiring or limited to, modification of Article XII, section 8, of the Constitution of Nebraska, in order to foster and enhance legal, social, and economic conditions in Nebraska consistent with and which advance those state interests that exist in the structure, development, and progress of agricultural production.

(2) Within the limits of funds appropriated for such purpose, the Executive Board of the Legislative Council may, in coordination and cooperation with the Agriculture Committee of the Legislature, commission experts in the fields of agricultural economics, agricultural law, commerce clause jurisprudence, and other areas of study and practice to provide assistance, specific research or reports, or presentations in order to assist the Agriculture Committee of the Legislature in carrying out the intent of the Legislature under this section.

Laws 2007, LB516, § 2.